Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1205
Tax; remittance.

The tax imposed by section 57-1202 shall be paid to the Tax Commissioner who shall pay all money received to the State Treasurer to be placed in the General Fund.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 17.